North Carolina, session 2025, SB430.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-137.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-137.1. Child restraint systems required.
(a) Every driver who is transporting one or more passengers of less than 16 years of age
shall have all such passengers properly secured in a child passenger restraint system or seat belt
which meets federal standards applicable at the time of its manufacture. For purposes of this
section, a "child passenger restraint system" means any device designed to restrain or position a
child in a motor vehicle, including a booster seat.
(a1) A child less than eight years of age and less than 80 pounds in weight 57 inches in
height shall be properly secured in a weight-appropriate height and weight appropriate child
passenger restraint system. In vehicles equipped with an active passenger-side front air bag, if
the vehicle has a rear seat, a child less than five years of age and less than 40 pounds in weight
shall be properly secured in a rear seat, unless the child restraint system is designed for use with
air bags. If system as follows:
(1) Beginning as a newborn, a child shall be properly secured in a rear facing child
passenger restraint system with transition to a forward-facing system
according to the manufacturer's instructions related to the child's height and
weight requirements for use of the system as indicated by the federally
required label on the car seat which states those requirements.
(2) The child shall be properly secured in a child passenger restraint system in a
rear seat unless at least one of the following exceptions applies:
a. The vehicle does not have a rear seat. This exception shall not apply
to a rear-facing child passenger restraint system being used in the front
seat of a motor vehicle that has an active front air bag.
b. The vehicle is not equipped with an active passenger-side front air bag.
c. The child passenger restraint system is designed for use with front air
bags.
(a2) A driver may satisfy the requirements of this section by properly securing a child
passenger with a seat belt as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a1) of this section, if no seating position
equipped with a lap and shoulder belt to properly secure the
weight-appropriate child passenger restraint system is available, a child less
*S430-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
than eight years of age and between at least 40 and 80 pounds may be
restrained by a properly fitted lap belt only.
(2) A child who is at least eight years of age or 57 inches in height may be
restrained by a properly secured lap and shoulder belt. For purposes of this
subdivision, a lap and shoulder belt are properly secured, if, when fastened,
all of the following apply:
a. The lap belt fits across the child's thighs and hips and not across the
child's abdomen.
b. The shoulder belt crosses the child's body diagonally at approximately
the mid-point of the child's shoulder and the center of the child's chest.
c. The child is able to sit with the child's back straight against the
vehicle's seat back cushion and with the child's knees bent over the
vehicle's seat edge without slouching.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 430-First Edition